Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-7020
Tax credit; distribution.

Any tax credit allowable to a partnership, a limited liability company, a subchapter S corporation, or an estate or trust may be distributed to the partners, limited liability company members, shareholders, or beneficiaries in the same manner as income is distributed.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 53.
January 1, 2035